Missouri, session 2026, HB2192.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2035, to read as follows:
1.2035. 1. Public institutions may, subject to appropriation, establish and fund
diversity, equity, and inclusion (DEI) initiatives including:
(1) DEI positions, offices, and programs;
(2) Inclusive curriculum and antibias training; and
(3) DEI statements and voluntary employee-engagement efforts.
2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, DEI initiatives shall not be
prohibited, defunded, or restricted.
3. No state law, policy, rule, or executive order shall penalize a public institution
for establishing and maintaining DEI policies and programs.
4. The Missouri commission on human rights shall receive and investigate
complaints of violations of this section and recommend appropriate measures to
reinstate programs or otherwise remedy a violation of this section.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.